Hawaii statutes.
[§21F-8] Agencies to cooperate. All
departments, agencies, and education institutions of the executive and judicial
branches, the office of Hawaiian affairs, and the University of Hawaii shall
comply with requests of the office of the legislative analyst for information,
data, estimates, and statistics on the funding revenue operations, and other
affairs of the department, agency, education institution, the office of
Hawaiian affairs, or University of Hawaii. The comptroller, the director of
finance, the director of taxation, the administrative director of the courts,
the administrator of the office of Hawaiian affairs, and the president of the
University of Hawaii shall provide the office of the legislative analyst with
full and free access to information, data, estimates, and statistics in the
possession of their respective departments on the state budget, revenue,
expenditures, and tax revenue and expenditures. [L 1990, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next